Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 23.1. Reduced Cigarette Ignition Propensity.

§§ 59.1-293.1 through 59.1-293.9.

Repealed by Acts 2014, cc. 370 and 418, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions pertaining to reduced cigarette ignition propensity, see §

9.1-209

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Former Chapter 23.1 (§§ 59.1-293.1 through 59.1-293.9) of Title 59.1, pertaining to reduced cigarette ignition propensity, was enacted by 2008, cc. 96, 348 and amended by 2012, cc. 66, 195.